Udmurt.aff
SFX k Y 447 		 
SFX k 0 и [^и][^н]
SFX k 0 ид .
SFX k 0 из .
SFX k 0 мы .
SFX k 0 эз [дзлнсту]
SFX k 0 ез [^дзлнст]
SFX k 0 ты [пфктсшхцчщӵ]
SFX k 0 ды [^пфктсшхцчщӵ]
SFX k 0 сы [пфктсшхцчщӵ]
SFX k 0 зы [^пфктсшхцчщӵ]
SFX k 0 ме . #1лицо	 вин.п.
SFX k 0 мес . 
SFX k 0 тэ [пфктсшхцчщӵ]  #2л.
SFX k 0 дэ [^пфктсшхцчщӵ] 
SFX k 0 тэс [пфктсшхцчщӵ] 
SFX k 0 дэс [^пфктсшхцчщӵ]
SFX k 0 сэ [пфктсшхцчщӵ] #3л.
SFX k 0 зэ [^пфктсшхцчщӵ] 
SFX k 0 сэс [пфктсшхцчщӵ]
SFX k 0 зэс [^пфктсшхцчщӵ] 
SFX k 0 лэн . 		#род.п.
SFX k 0 илэн .
SFX k 0 идлэн .
SFX k 0 излэн .
SFX k 0 мылэн .
SFX k 0 тылэн [пфктсшхцчщӵ]
SFX k 0 дылэн [^пфктсшхцчщӵ]
SFX k 0 сылэн [пфктсшхцчщӵ]
SFX k 0 зылэн [^пфктсшхцчщӵ]
SFX k 0 лэсь . 	# разд.п.
SFX k 0 илэсь .
SFX k 0 идлэсь .
SFX k 0 излэсь .
SFX k 0 мылэсь .
SFX k 0 тылэсь [пфктсшхцчщӵ]
SFX k 0 дылэсь [^пфктсшхцчщӵ]
SFX k 0 сылэсь [пфктсшхцчщӵ]
SFX k 0 зылэсь [^пфктсшхцчщӵ]
SFX k 0 лы .		 # дат.п.
SFX k 0 илы .
SFX k 0 идлы .
SFX k 0 излы .
SFX k 0 мылы .
SFX k 0 тылы [пфктсшхцчщӵ]
SFX k 0 дылы [^пфктсшхцчщӵ]
SFX k 0 сылы [пфктсшхцчщӵ]
SFX k 0 зылы [^пфктсшхцчщӵ]
SFX k 0 тэк . #лиш.п.
SFX k 0 итэк .
SFX k 0 идтэк .
SFX k 0 изтэк .
SFX k 0 мытэк .
SFX k 0 тытэк [пфктсшхцчщӵ]
SFX k 0 дытэк [^пфктсшхцчщӵ]
SFX k 0 сытэк [пфктсшхцчщӵ]
SFX k 0 зытэк [^пфктсшхцчщӵ]
SFX k 0 ъя [^уеыаоэяиюёӧӥь] #соотв.п.
SFX k 0 я [уеыаоэяиюёӧӥь]
SFX k 0 ия .
SFX k 0 идъя .
SFX k 0 изъя .
SFX k 0 мыя .
SFX k 0 тыя [пфктсшхцчщӵ]
SFX k 0 дыя [^пфктсшхцчщӵ]
SFX k 0 сыя [пфктсшхцчщӵ]
SFX k 0 зыя [^пфктсшхцчщӵ]
SFX k 0 ин . #твор.п. + местн.п. + входн.п.
SFX k 0 иным .
SFX k 0 инымы .
SFX k 0 иныд .
SFX k 0 иныды .
SFX k 0 иныз .
SFX k 0 инызы .	
SFX k 0 ам [^ьуеыаоэяиюӧӥё]
SFX k 0 амы [^ьуеыаоэяиюӧӥё]
SFX k 0 ад [^ьуеыаоэяиюӧӥё]
SFX k 0 ады [^ьуеыаоэяиюӧӥё]
SFX k 0 аз [^ьуеыаоэяиюӧӥё]
SFX k 0 азы [^ьуеыаоэяиюӧӥё]
SFX k 0 ям [ьуеыаоэяиюӧӥё]
SFX k 0 ямы [ьуеыаоэяиюӧӥё]
SFX k 0 яд [ьуеыаоэяиюӧӥё]
SFX k 0 яды [ьуеыаоэяиюӧӥё]
SFX k 0 яз [ьуеыаоэяиюӧӥё]
SFX k 0 язы [ьуеыаоэяиюӧӥё]
SFX k ь ям ь
SFX k ь ямы ь
SFX k ь яд ь
SFX k ь яды ь
SFX k ь яз ь
SFX k ь язы ь
SFX k 0 ысь . #исходн.п.
SFX k 0 ысьтым .
SFX k 0 ысьтымы .
SFX k 0 ысьтыд .
SFX k 0 ысьтыды .
SFX k 0 ысьтыз .
SFX k 0 ысьтызы .
SFX k 0 ысен . #отдал.п.
SFX k 0 ысеным .
SFX k 0 ысенымы .
SFX k 0 ысеныд .
SFX k 0 ысеныды .
SFX k 0 ысеныз .
SFX k 0 ысенызы .
SFX k 0 тӥ . 
SFX k 0 тӥм .
SFX k 0 тӥмы .
SFX k 0 тӥд .
SFX k 0 тӥды .
SFX k 0 тӥз .
SFX k 0 тӥзы .
SFX k 0 лань . #направ.п.
SFX k 0 илань .
SFX k 0 идлань .
SFX k 0 излань .
SFX k 0 мылань .
SFX k 0 тылань [пфктсшхцчщӵ]
SFX k 0 дылань [^пфктсшхцчщӵ]
SFX k 0 сылань [пфктсшхцчщӵ]
SFX k 0 зылань [^пфктсшхцчщӵ]
SFX k 0 озь [^ь] #предельн.п.
SFX k ь ёзь [ь]
SFX k 0 озям .
SFX k 0 озяд .
SFX k 0 озяз .
SFX k 0 мыозь .
SFX k 0 дыозь .
SFX k 0 зыозь .
SFX k 0 ъёс [^уеыаоэяиюёӧӥьъй]
SFX k 0 ос [уеыаоэяиюёӧӥ]
SFX k 0 ёс [ьъй]
SFX k 0 ъёсы [^уеыаоэяиюёӧӥьъй]
SFX k 0 ъёсыд [^уеыаоэяиюёӧӥьъй]
SFX k 0 ъёсыз [^уеыаоэяиюёӧӥьъй]
SFX k 0 ъёсмы [^уеыаоэяиюёӧӥьъй]
SFX k 0 ъёсты [^уеыаоэяиюёӧӥьъй]
SFX k 0 ъёссы [^уеыаоэяиюёӧӥьъй]
SFX k 0 осы [уеыаоэяиюёӧӥ]
SFX k 0 осыд [уеыаоэяиюёӧӥ]
SFX k 0 осыз [уеыаоэяиюёӧӥ]
SFX k 0 осмы [уеыаоэяиюёӧӥ]
SFX k 0 осты [уеыаоэяиюёӧӥ]
SFX k 0 оссы [уеыаоэяиюёӧӥ]
SFX k 0 ёсы [ьъй]
SFX k 0 ёсыд [ьъй]
SFX k 0 ёсыз [ьъй]
SFX k 0 ёсмы [ьъй]
SFX k 0 ёсты [ьъй]
SFX k 0 ёссы [ьъй]
SFX k 0 ъёсыз [^уеыаоэяиюёӧӥьъй] # вин.п.
SFX k 0 ъёсты [^уеыаоэяиюёӧӥьъй]
SFX k 0 осыз [уеыаоэяиюёӧӥ]
SFX k 0 осты [уеыаоэяиюёӧӥ]
SFX k 0 ёсыз [ьъй]
SFX k 0 ёсты [ьъй]
SFX k 0 ъёсме [^уеыаоэяиюёӧӥьъй]
SFX k 0 ъёсмес [^уеыаоэяиюёӧӥьъй]
SFX k 0 ъёстэ [^уеыаоэяиюёӧӥьъй]
SFX k 0 ъёстэс [^уеыаоэяиюёӧӥьъй]
SFX k 0 ъёссэ [^уеыаоэяиюёӧӥьъй]
SFX k 0 ъёссэс [^уеыаоэяиюёӧӥьъй]
SFX k 0 осме [уеыаоэяиюёӧӥ]
SFX k 0 осмес [уеыаоэяиюёӧӥ]
SFX k 0 остэ [уеыаоэяиюёӧӥ]
SFX k 0 остэс [уеыаоэяиюёӧӥ]
SFX k 0 оссэ [уеыаоэяиюёӧӥ]
SFX k 0 оссэс [уеыаоэяиюёӧӥ]
SFX k 0 ёсме [ьъй]
SFX k 0 ёсмес [ьъй]
SFX k 0 ёстэ [ьъй]
SFX k 0 ёстэс [ьъй]
SFX k 0 ёссэ [ьъй]
SFX k 0 ёссэс [ьъй]
SFX k 0 ъёслэн [^уеыаоэяиюёӧӥьъй] # род.п.
SFX k 0 ослэн [уеыаоэяиюёӧӥ]
SFX k 0 ёслэн [ьъй]
SFX k 0 ъёсылэн [^уеыаоэяиюёӧӥьъй]
SFX k 0 ъёсыдлэн [^уеыаоэяиюёӧӥьъй]
SFX k 0 ъёсызлэн [^уеыаоэяиюёӧӥьъй]
SFX k 0 ъёсмылэн [^уеыаоэяиюёӧӥьъй]
SFX k 0 ъёстылэн [^уеыаоэяиюёӧӥьъй]
SFX k 0 ъёссылэн [^уеыаоэяиюёӧӥьъй]
SFX k 0 осылэн [уеыаоэяиюёӧӥ]
SFX k 0 осыдлэн [уеыаоэяиюёӧӥ]
SFX k 0 осызлэн [уеыаоэяиюёӧӥ]
SFX k 0 осмылэн [уеыаоэяиюёӧӥ]
SFX k 0 остылэн [уеыаоэяиюёӧӥ]
SFX k 0 оссылэн [уеыаоэяиюёӧӥ]
SFX k 0 ёсылэн [ьъй]
SFX k 0 ёсыдлэн [ьъй]
SFX k 0 ёсызлэн [ьъй]
SFX k 0 ёсмылэн [ьъй]
SFX k 0 ёстылэн [ьъй]
SFX k 0 ёссылэн [ьъй]
SFX k 0 ъёслэсь [^уеыаоэяиюёӧӥьъй] # разд.п.
SFX k 0 ослэсь [уеыаоэяиюёӧӥ]
SFX k 0 ёслэсь [ьъй]
SFX k 0 ъёсылэсь [^уеыаоэяиюёӧӥьъй]
SFX k 0 ъёсыдлэсь [^уеыаоэяиюёӧӥьъй]
SFX k 0 ъёсызлэсь [^уеыаоэяиюёӧӥьъй]
SFX k 0 ъёсмылэсь [^уеыаоэяиюёӧӥьъй]
SFX k 0 ъёстылэсь [^уеыаоэяиюёӧӥьъй]
SFX k 0 ъёссылэсь [^уеыаоэяиюёӧӥьъй]
SFX k 0 осылэсь [уеыаоэяиюёӧӥ]
SFX k 0 осыдлэсь [уеыаоэяиюёӧӥ]
SFX k 0 осызлэсь [уеыаоэяиюёӧӥ]
SFX k 0 осмылэсь [уеыаоэяиюёӧӥ]
SFX k 0 остылэсь [уеыаоэяиюёӧӥ]
SFX k 0 оссылэсь [уеыаоэяиюёӧӥ]
SFX k 0 ёсылэсь [ьъй]
SFX k 0 ёсыдлэсь [ьъй]
SFX k 0 ёсызлэсь [ьъй]
SFX k 0 ёсмылэсь [ьъй]
SFX k 0 ёстылэсь [ьъй]
SFX k 0 ёссылэсь [ьъй]
SFX k 0 ъёслы [^уеыаоэяиюёӧӥьъй] # дат.п.
SFX k 0 ослы [уеыаоэяиюёӧӥ]
SFX k 0 ёслы [ьъй]
SFX k 0 ъёсылы [^уеыаоэяиюёӧӥьъй]
SFX k 0 ъёсыдлы [^уеыаоэяиюёӧӥьъй]
SFX k 0 ъёсызлы [^уеыаоэяиюёӧӥьъй]
SFX k 0 ъёсмылы [^уеыаоэяиюёӧӥьъй]
SFX k 0 ъёстылы [^уеыаоэяиюёӧӥьъй]
SFX k 0 ъёссылы [^уеыаоэяиюёӧӥьъй]
SFX k 0 осылы [уеыаоэяиюёӧӥ]
SFX k 0 осыдлы [уеыаоэяиюёӧӥ]
SFX k 0 осызлы [уеыаоэяиюёӧӥ]
SFX k 0 осмылы [уеыаоэяиюёӧӥ]
SFX k 0 остылы [уеыаоэяиюёӧӥ]
SFX k 0 оссылы [уеыаоэяиюёӧӥ]
SFX k 0 ёсылы [ьъй]
SFX k 0 ёсыдлы [ьъй]
SFX k 0 ёсызлы [ьъй]
SFX k 0 ёсмылы [ьъй]
SFX k 0 ёстылы [ьъй]
SFX k 0 ёссылы [ьъй]
SFX k 0 ъёстэк [^уеыаоэяиюёӧӥьъй] # лиш.п.
SFX k 0 остэк [уеыаоэяиюёӧӥ]
SFX k 0 ёстэк [ьъй]
SFX k 0 ъёсытэк [^уеыаоэяиюёӧӥьъй]
SFX k 0 ъёсыдтэк [^уеыаоэяиюёӧӥьъй]
SFX k 0 ъёсызтэк [^уеыаоэяиюёӧӥьъй]
SFX k 0 ъёсмытэк [^уеыаоэяиюёӧӥьъй]
SFX k 0 ъёстытэк [^уеыаоэяиюёӧӥьъй]
SFX k 0 ъёссытэк [^уеыаоэяиюёӧӥьъй]
SFX k 0 осытэк [уеыаоэяиюёӧӥ]
SFX k 0 осыдтэк [уеыаоэяиюёӧӥ]
SFX k 0 осызтэк [уеыаоэяиюёӧӥ]
SFX k 0 осмытэк [уеыаоэяиюёӧӥ]
SFX k 0 остытэк [уеыаоэяиюёӧӥ]
SFX k 0 оссытэк [уеыаоэяиюёӧӥ]
SFX k 0 ёсытэк [ьъй]
SFX k 0 ёсыдтэк [ьъй]
SFX k 0 ёсызтэк [ьъй]
SFX k 0 ёсмытэк [ьъй]
SFX k 0 ёстытэк [ьъй]
SFX k 0 ёссытэк [ьъй]
SFX k 0 ъёсъя [^уеыаоэяиюёӧӥьъй] # соотв.п.
SFX k 0 осъя [уеыаоэяиюёӧӥ]
SFX k 0 ёсъя [ьъй]
SFX k 0 ъёсыя [^уеыаоэяиюёӧӥьъй]
SFX k 0 ъёсыдъя [^уеыаоэяиюёӧӥьъй]
SFX k 0 ъёсызъя [^уеыаоэяиюёӧӥьъй]
SFX k 0 ъёсмыя [^уеыаоэяиюёӧӥьъй]
SFX k 0 ъёстыя [^уеыаоэяиюёӧӥьъй]
SFX k 0 ъёссыя [^уеыаоэяиюёӧӥьъй]
SFX k 0 осыя [уеыаоэяиюёӧӥ]
SFX k 0 осыдъя [уеыаоэяиюёӧӥ]
SFX k 0 осызъя [уеыаоэяиюёӧӥ]
SFX k 0 осмыя [уеыаоэяиюёӧӥ]
SFX k 0 остыя [уеыаоэяиюёӧӥ]
SFX k 0 оссыя [уеыаоэяиюёӧӥ]
SFX k 0 ёсыя [ьъй]
SFX k 0 ёсыдъя [ьъй]
SFX k 0 ёсызъя [ьъй]
SFX k 0 ёсмыя [ьъй]
SFX k 0 ёстыя [ьъй]
SFX k 0 ёссыя [ьъй]
SFX k 0 ъёсын [^уеыаоэяиюёӧӥьъй] # твор.п. + местн.п.
SFX k 0 осын [уеыаоэяиюёӧӥ]
SFX k 0 ёсын [ьъй]
SFX k 0 ъёсыным [^уеыаоэяиюёӧӥьъй] # твор.п.
SFX k 0 ъёсынымы [^уеыаоэяиюёӧӥьъй]
SFX k 0 ъёсыныд [^уеыаоэяиюёӧӥьъй]
SFX k 0 ъёсыныды [^уеыаоэяиюёӧӥьъй]
SFX k 0 ъёсыныз [^уеыаоэяиюёӧӥьъй]
SFX k 0 ъёсынызы [^уеыаоэяиюёӧӥьъй]
SFX k 0 осыным [уеыаоэяиюёӧӥ]
SFX k 0 осынымы [уеыаоэяиюёӧӥ]
SFX k 0 осыныд [уеыаоэяиюёӧӥ]
SFX k 0 осыныды [уеыаоэяиюёӧӥ]
SFX k 0 осыныз [уеыаоэяиюёӧӥ]
SFX k 0 осынызы [уеыаоэяиюёӧӥ]
SFX k 0 ёсыным [ьъй]
SFX k 0 ёсынымы [ьъй]
SFX k 0 ёсыныд [ьъй]
SFX k 0 ёсыныды [ьъй]
SFX k 0 ёсыныз [ьъй]
SFX k 0 ёсынызы [ьъй]
SFX k 0 ъёсам [^уеыаоэяиюёӧӥьъй] # местн.п. + входн.п
SFX k 0 ъёсамы [^уеыаоэяиюёӧӥьъй]
SFX k 0 ъёсад [^уеыаоэяиюёӧӥьъй]
SFX k 0 ъёсады [^уеыаоэяиюёӧӥьъй]
SFX k 0 ъёсаз [^уеыаоэяиюёӧӥьъй]
SFX k 0 ъёсазы [^уеыаоэяиюёӧӥьъй]
SFX k 0 осам [уеыаоэяиюёӧӥ]
SFX k 0 осамы [уеыаоэяиюёӧӥ]
